West Virginia, session 2025, HB2685.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 14. CIVIL SERVICE FOR DEPUTY SHERIFFS. §7-14-13a.  Appointment of deputy chief to county sheriff's department. (a) County sheriffs shall have the authority and discretion to appoint a qualified person to the position of deputy chief.  The deputy chief will serve as an augmentation to the sheriff and chief deputy, as well as fulfill statutory requirements of a sheriff’s department.  (b) The deputy chief position would operate the same as the chief deputy, but would be one step below the chief deputy in the scope of authority. The deputy chief would be in place to augment the appointed administrative staff, but would also be subject to work assignments the same as sworn deputy sheriffs when need be. (c) The filling and use of this position would be entirely at the discretion of the sheriff of the county. Eligible sheriffs are under no obligation to utilize this position, but may do so if they feel that the position would be of benefit to the agency and the county they serve.(d) County sheriffs may appoint a deputy chief if the department has 25 or more sworn deputy sheriffs on staff.(e) The deputy chief position would be subject to the same laws and rules sets as the chief deputy, including all state statutes and the federal Hatch Act.